ko/liblouis/ko2.ctb
always 하옓 245-126-34-2-12
always 하옔 245-126-34-2-3
always 하옕 245-126-34-2-236
always 하옖 245-126-34-2-256
always 하옗 245-126-34-2-356
always 하옘 245-126-34-26
always 하옙 245-126-34-12
always 하옚 245-126-34-12-3
always 하옛 245-126-34-3
always 하옜 245-126-34-34
always 하옝 245-126-34-2356
always 하옞 245-126-34-13
always 하옟 245-126-34-23
always 하옠 245-126-34-235
always 하옡 245-126-34-236
always 하옢 245-126-34-256
always 하옣 245-126-34-356
always 하오 245-126-136
always 하옥 245-126-1346
always 하옦 245-126-1346-1
always 하옧 245-126-1346-3
always 하온 245-126-12356
always 하옩 245-126-12356-13
always 하옪 245-126-12356-356
always 하옫 245-126-136-35
always 하올 245-126-136-2
always 하옭 245-126-136-2-1
always 하옮 245-126-136-2-26
always 하옯 245-126-136-2-12
always 하옰 245-126-136-2-3
always 하옱 245-126-136-2-236
always 하옲 245-126-136-2-256
always 하옳 245-126-136-2-356
always 하옴 245-126-136-26
always 하옵 245-126-136-12
always 하옶 245-126-136-12-3
always 하옷 245-126-136-3
always 하옸 245-126-136-34
always 하옹 245-126-123456
always 하옺 245-126-136-13
always 하옻 245-126-136-23
always 하옼 245-126-136-235
always 하옽 245-126-136-236
always 하옾 245-126-136-256
always 하옿 245-126-136-356
always 하와 245-126-1236
always 하왁 245-126-1236-1
always 하왂 245-126-1236-1-1
always 하왃 245-126-1236-1-3
always 하완 245-126-1236-25
always 하왅 245-126-1236-25-13
always 하왆 245-126-1236-25-356
always 하왇 245-126-1236-35
always 하왈 245-126-1236-2
always 하왉 245-126-1236-2-1
always 하왊 245-126-1236-2-26
always 하왋 245-126-1236-2-12
always 하왌 245-126-1236-2-3
always 하왍 245-126-1236-2-236
always 하왎 245-126-1236-2-256
always 하왏 245-126-1236-2-356
always 하왐 245-126-1236-26
always 하왑 245-126-1236-12
always 하왒 245-126-1236-12-3
always 하왓 245-126-1236-3
always 하왔 245-126-1236-34
always 하왕 245-126-1236-2356
always 하왖 245-126-1236-13
always 하왗 245-126-1236-23
always 하왘 245-126-1236-235
always 하왙 245-126-1236-236
always 하왚 245-126-1236-256
always 하왛 245-126-1236-356
always 하왜 245-126-1236-1235
always 하왝 245-126-1236-1235-1
always 하왞 245-126-1236-1235-1-1
always 하왟 245-126-1236-1235-1-3
always 하왠 245-126-1236-1235-25
always 하왡 245-126-1236-1235-25-13
always 하왢 245-126-1236-1235-25-356
always 하왣 245-126-1236-1235-35
always 하왤 245-126-1236-1235-2
always 하왥 245-126-1236-1235-2-1
always 하왦 245-126-1236-1235-2-26
always 하왧 245-126-1236-1235-2-12
always 하왨 245-126-1236-1235-2-3
always 하왩 245-126-1236-1235-2-236
always 하왪 245-126-1236-1235-2-256
always 하왫 245-126-1236-1235-2-356
always 하왬 245-126-1236-1235-26
always 하왭 245-126-1236-1235-12
always 하왮 245-126-1236-1235-12-3
always 하왯 245-126-1236-1235-3
always 하왰 245-126-1236-1235-34
always 하왱 245-126-1236-1235-2356
always 하왲 245-126-1236-1235-13
always 하왳 245-126-1236-1235-23
always 하왴 245-126-1236-1235-235
always 하왵 245-126-1236-1235-236
always 하왶 245-126-1236-1235-256
always 하왷 245-126-1236-1235-356
always 하외 245-126-13456
always 하왹 245-126-13456-1
always 하왺 245-126-13456-1-1
always 하왻 245-126-13456-1-3
always 하왼 245-126-13456-25
always 하왽 245-126-13456-25-13
always 하왾 245-126-13456-25-356
always 하왿 245-126-13456-35
always 하욀 245-126-13456-2
always 하욁 245-126-13456-2-1
always 하욂 245-126-13456-2-26
always 하욃 245-126-13456-2-12
always 하욄 245-126-13456-2-3
always 하욅 245-126-13456-2-236
always 하욆 245-126-13456-2-256
always 하욇 245-126-13456-2-356
always 하욈 245-126-13456-26
always 하욉 245-126-13456-12
always 하욊 245-126-13456-12-3
always 하욋 245-126-13456-3
always 하욌 245-126-13456-34
always 하욍 245-126-13456-2356
always 하욎 245-126-13456-13
always 하욏 245-126-13456-23
always 하욐 245-126-13456-235
always 하욑 245-126-13456-236
always 하욒 245-126-13456-256
always 하욓 245-126-13456-356
always 하요 245-126-346
always 하욕 245-126-346-1
always 하욖 245-126-346-1-1
always 하욗 245-126-346-1-3
always 하욘 245-126-346-25
always 하욙 245-126-346-25-13
always 하욚 245-126-346-25-356
always 하욛 245-126-346-35
always 하욜 245-126-346-2
always 하욝 245-126-346-2-1
always 하욞 245-126-346-2-26
always 하욟 245-126-346-2-12
always 하욠 245-126-346-2-3
always 하욡 245-126-346-2-236
always 하욢 245-126-346-2-256
always 하욣 245-126-346-2-356
always 하욤 245-126-346-26
always 하욥 245-126-346-12
always 하욦 245-126-346-12-3
always 하욧 245-126-346-3
always 하욨 245-126-346-34
always 하용 245-126-346-2356
always 하욪 245-126-346-13
always 하욫 245-126-346-23
always 하욬 245-126-346-235
always 하욭 245-126-346-236
always 하욮 245-126-346-256
always 하욯 245-126-346-356
always 하우 245-126-134
always 하욱 245-126-134-1
always 하욲 245-126-134-1-1
always 하욳 245-126-134-1-3
always 하운 245-126-1245
always 하욵 245-126-1245-13
always 하욶 245-126-1245-356
always 하욷 245-126-134-35
always 하울 245-126-12346
always 하욹 245-126-12346-1
always 하욺 245-126-12346-26
always 하욻 245-126-12346-12
always 하욼 245-126-12346-3
always 하욽 245-126-12346-236
always 하욾 245-126-12346-256
always 하욿 245-126-12346-356
always 하움 245-126-134-26
always 하웁 245-126-134-12
always 하웂 245-126-134-12-3
always 하웃 245-126-134-3
always 하웄 245-126-134-34
always 하웅 245-126-134-2356
always 하웆 245-126-134-13
always 하웇 245-126-134-23
always 하웈 245-126-134-235
always 하웉 245-126-134-236
always 하웊 245-126-134-256
always 하웋 245-126-134-356
always 하워 245-126-1234
always 하웍 245-126-1234-1
always 하웎 245-126-1234-1-1
always 하웏 245-126-1234-1-3
always 하원 245-126-1234-25
always 하웑 245-126-1234-25-13
always 하웒 245-126-1234-25-356
always 하웓 245-126-1234-35
always 하월 245-126-1234-2
always 하웕 245-126-1234-2-1
always 하웖 245-126-1234-2-26
always 하웗 245-126-1234-2-12
always 하웘 245-126-1234-2-3
always 하웙 245-126-1234-2-236
always 하웚 245-126-1234-2-256
always 하웛 245-126-1234-2-356
always 하웜 245-126-1234-26
always 하웝 245-126-1234-12
always 하웞 245-126-1234-12-3
always 하웟 245-126-1234-3
always 하웠 245-126-1234-34
always 하웡 245-126-1234-2356
always 하웢 245-126-1234-13
always 하웣 245-126-1234-23
always 하웤 245-126-1234-235
always 하웥 245-126-1234-236
always 하웦 245-126-1234-256
always 하웧 245-126-1234-356
always 하웨 245-126-1234-1235
always 하웩 245-126-1234-1235-1
always 하웪 245-126-1234-1235-1-1
always 하웫 245-126-1234-1235-1-3
always 하웬 245-126-1234-1235-25
always 하웭 245-126-1234-1235-25-13
always 하웮 245-126-1234-1235-25-356
always 하웯 245-126-1234-1235-35
always 하웰 245-126-1234-1235-2
always 하웱 245-126-1234-1235-2-1
always 하웲 245-126-1234-1235-2-26
always 하웳 245-126-1234-1235-2-12
always 하웴 245-126-1234-1235-2-3
always 하웵 245-126-1234-1235-2-236
always 하웶 245-126-1234-1235-2-256
always 하웷 245-126-1234-1235-2-356
always 하웸 245-126-1234-1235-26
always 하웹 245-126-1234-1235-12
always 하웺 245-126-1234-1235-12-3
always 하웻 245-126-1234-1235-3
always 하웼 245-126-1234-1235-34
always 하웽 245-126-1234-1235-2356
always 하웾 245-126-1234-1235-13
always 하웿 245-126-1234-1235-23
always 하윀 245-126-1234-1235-235
always 하윁 245-126-1234-1235-236
always 하윂 245-126-1234-1235-256
always 하윃 245-126-1234-1235-356
always 하위 245-126-134-1235
always 하윅 245-126-134-1235-1
always 하윆 245-126-134-1235-1-1
always 하윇 245-126-134-1235-1-3
always 하윈 245-126-134-1235-25
always 하윉 245-126-134-1235-25-13
always 하윊 245-126-134-1235-25-356
always 하윋 245-126-134-1235-35
always 하윌 245-126-134-1235-2
always 하윍 245-126-134-1235-2-1
always 하윎 245-126-134-1235-2-26
always 하윏 245-126-134-1235-2-12
always 하윐 245-126-134-1235-2-3
always 하윑 245-126-134-1235-2-236
always 하윒 245-126-134-1235-2-256
always 하윓 245-126-134-1235-2-356
always 하윔 245-126-134-1235-26
always 하윕 245-126-134-1235-12
always 하윖 245-126-134-1235-12-3
always 하윗 245-126-134-1235-3
always 하윘 245-126-134-1235-34
always 하윙 245-126-134-1235-2356
always 하윚 245-126-134-1235-13
always 하윛 245-126-134-1235-23
always 하윜 245-126-134-1235-235
always 하윝 245-126-134-1235-236
always 하윞 245-126-134-1235-256
always 하윟 245-126-134-1235-356
always 하유 245-126-146
always 하육 245-126-146-1
always 하윢 245-126-146-1-1
always 하윣 245-126-146-1-3
always 하윤 245-126-146-25
always 하윥 245-126-146-25-13
always 하윦 245-126-146-25-356
always 하윧 245-126-146-35
always 하율 245-126-146-2
always 하윩 245-126-146-2-1
always 하윪 245-126-146-2-26
always 하윫 245-126-146-2-12
always 하윬 245-126-146-2-3
always 하윭 245-126-146-2-236
always 하윮 245-126-146-2-256
always 하윯 245-126-146-2-356
always 하윰 245-126-146-26
always 하윱 245-126-146-12
always 하윲 245-126-146-12-3
always 하윳 245-126-146-3
always 하윴 245-126-146-34
always 하융 245-126-146-2356
always 하윶 245-126-146-13
always 하윷 245-126-146-23
always 하윸 245-126-146-235
always 하윹 245-126-146-236
always 하윺 245-126-146-256
always 하윻 245-126-146-356
always 하으 245-126-246
always 하윽 245-126-246-1
always 하윾 245-126-246-1-1
always 하윿 245-126-246-1-3
always 하은 245-126-1356
always 하읁 245-126-1356-13
always 하읂 245-126-1356-356
always 하읃 245-126-246-35
always 하을 245-126-2346
always 하읅 245-126-2346-1
always 하읆 245-126-2346-26
always 하읇 245-126-2346-12
always 하읈 245-126-2346-3
always 하읉 245-126-2346-236
always 하읊 245-126-2346-256
always 하읋 245-126-2346-356
always 하음 245-126-246-26
always 하읍 245-126-246-12
always 하읎 245-126-246-12-3
always 하읏 245-126-246-3
always 하읐 245-126-246-34
always 하응 245-126-246-2356
always 하읒 245-126-246-13
always 하읓 245-126-246-23
always 하읔 245-126-246-235
always 하읕 245-126-246-236
always 하읖 245-126-246-256
always 하읗 245-126-246-356
always 하의 245-126-2456
always 하읙 245-126-2456-1
always 하읚 245-126-2456-1-1
always 하읛 245-126-2456-1-3
always 하읜 245-126-2456-25
always 하읝 245-126-2456-25-13
always 하읞 245-126-2456-25-356
always 하읟 245-126-2456-35
always 하읠 245-126-2456-2
always 하읡 245-126-2456-2-1
always 하읢 245-126-2456-2-26
always 하읣 245-126-2456-2-12
always 하읤 245-126-2456-2-3
always 하읥 245-126-2456-2-236
always 하읦 245-126-2456-2-256
always 하읧 245-126-2456-2-356
always 하읨 245-126-2456-26
always 하읩 245-126-2456-12
always 하읪 245-126-2456-12-3
always 하읫 245-126-2456-3
always 하읬 245-126-2456-34
always 하읭 245-126-2456-2356
always 하읮 245-126-2456-13
always 하읯 245-126-2456-23
always 하읰 245-126-2456-235
always 하읱 245-126-2456-236
always 하읲 245-126-2456-256
always 하읳 245-126-2456-356
always 하이 245-126-135
always 하익 245-126-135-1
always 하읶 245-126-135-1-1
always 하읷 245-126-135-1-3
always 하인 245-126-12345
always 하읹 245-126-12345-13
always 하읺 245-126-12345-356
always 하읻 245-126-135-35
always 하일 245-126-135-2
always 하읽 245-126-135-2-1
always 하읾 245-126-135-2-26
always 하읿 245-126-135-2-12
always 하잀 245-126-135-2-3
always 하잁 245-126-135-2-236
always 하잂 245-126-135-2-256
always 하잃 245-126-135-2-356
always 하임 245-126-135-26
always 하입 245-126-135-12
always 하잆 245-126-135-12-3
always 하잇 245-126-135-3
always 하있 245-126-135-34
always 하잉 245-126-135-2356
always 하잊 245-126-135-13
always 하잋 245-126-135-23
always 하잌 245-126-135-235
always 하잍 245-126-135-236
always 하잎 245-126-135-256
always 하잏 245-126-135-356
